Montana, session 2025, HB508.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 20-1-102, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-1-102. Legislative goals for public elementary and secondary schools. It is the goal of the
legislature that Montana's public elementary and secondary school system, in cooperation with parents or
guardians, create a learning environment for each student that:
(1) develops a sound foundation for literacy and numeracy during the early years that is built upon
on and reinforced throughout the educational experience;
(2) furthers the ability to reason critically, creatively, and strategically;
(3) fosters the ability to effectively understand and communicate ideas, knowledge, and thoughts;
(4) develops a sense of personal and civic responsibility;
(5) provides an in-depth understanding of the American political, social, and economic systems
and the historical context from which they arose;
(6) provides familiarization with political, social, and economic systems found elsewhere in the
world;
(7) strengthens media literacy, including:
(a) developing the ability to access, analyze, evaluate, create, and act using all forms of
communication; and
(b) reducing susceptibility to disinformation, misinformation, propaganda, and indoctrination.
(7)(8) develops a strong work ethic, postsecondary readiness, and employment skills;
(8)(9) encourages a healthy lifestyle; and
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 508

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 508.1
(9)(10) supports instruction of financial literacy, where students obtain the knowledge and skills
required to succeed financially."
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 508